Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1107
Officers; alternate; notice of appointment.

On making every such appointment, the officer promptly shall notify the appointee directly, and shall concurrently give notice to the public official, to be known as the filing authority, whose office is designated by law as the filing place or repository of the officer's official oath or undertaking, or oath and undertaking, which notice in each instance shall include the appointee's name and address, and his rank in order of succession. The officer likewise shall notify both the alternate concerned and the filing authority promptly of his removal of any alternate, or change in his order of succession. All such data in the hands of the filing authority shall at all times be open to public inspection.

Laws 1959, c. 457, § 7, p. 1519.